Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services, in consultation with
the State Forestry Department, the Oregon Forest and Industries Council, the Oregon Small
Woodlands Association, Oregon State University,  the Oregon Prescribed Fire Council and a
representative of the insurance industry, shall study liability  for prescribed fires. The study
shall examine:
(a) The accessibility of insurance coverage for prescribed fires, including insurance pre-
mium costs, the number of companies that offer the coverage  and whether companies that
offer the coverage impose minimum equipment requirements;
(b) Any barriers to increasing the accessibility  of insurance coverage for prescribed fires,
including whether a liability standard of negligence or gross negligence  for prescribed fires
makes the coverage more or less affordable;
(c) How often escaped prescribed  fires occur, how many acres escaped prescribed fires
consume, costs associated with suppressing escaped prescribed fires,  costs associated with
property damage caused by escaped prescribed fires and how states  pay for suppression of
escaped prescribed fires; and
(d) Which states have  adopted liability standards of negligence and gross negligence for
prescribed fires and whether states that have shifted a liability  standard from negligence to
gross negligence have subsequently  observed differences in numbers of prescribed fires con-
ducted, of acres burned in prescribed fires or of escaped prescribed fires.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall report to an appropriate
committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on  the results of the study no
later than July 1, 2022.
(3) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, shall:
(a) Assist the department in complying with the  requirements of subsection (1) of this
section; and
(b) Upon request by the department, and to  the extent permitted by laws related to
confidentiality, provide information and advice to the department that the department deems
necessary to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 2571 (HB 2571-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 28, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2571 (HB 2571-A) Page 2